Tennessee, session 114, SB1085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-902(11), is amended by
deleting subdivision (C) and substituting instead the following:
(C) A private postsecondary institution that has its primary campus domiciled in
this state and that is accredited by, or a candidate for accreditation by, a regional
accrediting association;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1085
001020
- 1 -